Hawaii statutes.
§271-5 Exemptions, generally.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, its contents shall not
apply to:

(1) Persons transporting their own property where the
transportation is in furtherance of a primary business purpose or enterprise of
that person, except where the transportation is undertaken by a motor carrier
to evade the regulatory purposes of this chapter;

(2) Persons operating motor vehicles when engaged in
the transportation of school children and teachers to and from school, and to
and from school functions; provided that these persons may engage in providing
transportation at special rates for groups of persons belonging to an
eleemosynary or benevolent organization or association domiciled in this State
where the organization or association sponsors or is conducting a nonregular
excursion; provided that whenever the persons engage in the transportation of
persons other than those exempted in this paragraph, that portion of their
operation shall not be exempt from this chapter. Nothing in this paragraph
shall be construed to authorize any person to engage in the transportation of
persons, other than the transportation of persons exempted by the terms of this
paragraph, without a permit or certificate issued by the commission authorizing
such transportation;

(3) Persons operating taxicabs or other motor
vehicles utilized in performing a bona fide taxicab service.
"Taxicab" includes:

(A) Any motor vehicle used in the movement of
passengers on the public highways under the following circumstances, namely the
passenger hires the vehicle on call or at a fixed stand, with or without
baggage for transportation, and controls the vehicle to the passenger's
destination;

(B) Any motor vehicle for hire having seating
accommodations for eight or fewer passengers used in the movement of passengers
on the public highways that may, as part of a continuous trip, pick up or
discharge passengers from various unrelated locations; provided that they shall
be regulated by the counties in accordance with section 46-16.5(c); and
provided further that this subparagraph shall not apply to any exclusive rights
granted by the department of transportation for taxicab services at facilities
under the department's control; and

(C) Any motor vehicle having seating
accommodations for eight or fewer passengers used in the movement of passengers
on the public highways between a terminal, i.e., a fixed stand, in the Honolulu
district, as defined in section 4-1 and a terminal in a geographical district
outside the limits of the Honolulu district, and vice versa, without picking up
passengers other than at the terminals or fixed stands; provided that the
passengers may be picked up by telephone call from their homes in the rural
area or may be unloaded at any point between the fixed stands or may be
delivered to their homes in the rural area;

(4) Persons operating motor vehicles in the
transportation of persons pursuant to a franchise from the legislature and
whose operations are presently regulated under chapter 269;

(5) Nonprofit agricultural cooperative associations
to the extent that they engage in the transportation of their own property or
the property of their members;

(6) Persons operating motor vehicles specially
constructed for the towing of disabled or wrecked vehicles but not otherwise
used in the transportation of property for compensation or hire;

(7) Persons operating motor vehicles in the
transportation of mail, newspapers, periodicals, magazines, messages,
documents, letters, or blueprints;

(8) Persons operating funeral cars or ambulances;

(9) Persons operating motor vehicles in the
transportation of garbage or refuse;

(10) Persons operating the type of passenger carrying
motor vehicles known as "sampan buses" within the radius of twenty
miles from the city of Hilo, Hawaii;

(11) Persons transporting unprocessed pineapple to a
cannery, seed corn to a processing facility, or returning any containers used
in such transportation to the fields;

(12) Sugar plantations transporting sugarcane, raw
sugar, molasses, sugar by-products, and farming supplies for neighboring
farmers pursuant to contracts administered by the United States Department of
Agriculture;

(13) Persons engaged in the ranching or meat or feed
business who transport cattle to slaughterhouses for hire where such
transportation is their sole transportation for hire and where their earnings
from the transportation constitute less than fifty per cent of their gross
income from their business and the transportation for hire;

(14) Persons transporting unprocessed raw milk to
processing plants and returning any containers used in such transportation to
dairy farms for reloading;

(15) Persons transporting animal feeds to animal
husbandry farmers and farming supplies directly to animal husbandry farmers and
returning any containers used in such transportation to these sources of such
feeds and supplies for reloading;

(16) Persons engaged in transporting not more than
fifteen passengers between their places of abode, or termini near such places,
and their places of employment in a single daily round trip where the driver is
also on the driver's way to or from the driver's place of employment;

(17) Persons transporting passengers without charge in
motor vehicles owned or operated by such person, where such transportation is
provided in conjunction with and in furtherance of a related primary business
purpose or enterprise of that person, and such transportation is provided only
directly to and from the place of business of such person, except that this
exemption shall not apply to persons making any contract, agreement, or
arrangement to provide, procure, furnish, or arrange for transportation as a
travel agent or broker or a person engaged in tour or sightseeing activities,
nor shall this exemption apply where the transportation is undertaken by a
person to evade the regulatory purposes of this chapter; and

(18) Persons conducting the type of county-regulated
passenger carrying operation known as "jitney services". For the
purposes of this paragraph, "jitney services" means public
transportation services utilizing motor vehicles that have seating
accommodations for six to twenty-five passengers, operate along specific routes
during defined service hours, and levy a flat fare schedule. [L 1961, c 121, pt
of §2; am L 1962, c 12, §§3, 4, 7; am L 1963, c 137, §2; am L 1965, c 215, §1;
Supp, §106C-5; HRS §271-5; am L 1971, c 98, §1; am L 1973, c 193, §1; am L Sp
1977 1st, c 20, §2; am L 1978, c 66, §1; am L 1979, c 105, §26; gen ch 1985; am
L 1988, c 286, §3; am L 1995, c 98, §2; am L 1997, c 120, §§2, 8; am L 2002, c
28, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next